Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2849YH (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 461 Section 1. Section 299.12, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. When a child becomes chronically absent, a school 3 official shall send a notice by ordinary mail or electronic 4 mail to the county attorney of the county in which the public 5 schoolâs central administrative office is located, and a notice 6 by certified ordinary mail to the childâs parent, guardian, 7 or legal or actual custodian of the child, if the child is 8 not an emancipated minor, or to the child, if the child is an 9 emancipated minor, that includes information related to the 10 childâs absences from school and the policies and disciplinary 11 processes associated with additional absences. 12